Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-604.01
Department of Health and Human Services; notified of facility not currently licensed; reports made; by whom; investigation.

Any local or state agency or department, or any private facility involved in arranging or supervising placements for those persons requiring care or supervision, shall notify the Department of Health and Human Services when there is reason to believe that the total number of persons served in any institution, facility, place, or building exceeds three individuals and that such facility is not currently licensed by the Department of Health and Human Services. The department shall investigate or inspect such complaints pursuant to the Health Care Facility Licensure Act.

Laws 1981, LB 487, § 4;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 843;

Laws 2000, LB 819, § 154;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 732.

Health Care Facility Licensure Act, see section 71-401.